Utah statutes.
75-2a-124.   Provisions cumulative with existing law.
The provisions of this chapter are cumulative with existing law regarding a
person's right to consent or refuse to consent to medical treatment and do not
impair any existing rights or responsibilities that a health care provider, a
person, including a minor or incapacitated person, or a person's family or
surrogate may have in regard to the provision, withholding or withdrawal of
life sustaining procedures under the common law or statutes of the state.
